trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nga</l>       <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="empè/nyer__vblex">
      
  <e>       <p><l>nyer</l>      <r>nyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>nyer</l>      <r>nyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>nyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="empé/nyer__vblex">
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nyer</l>      <r>nyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nyer</l>      <r>nyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>nyer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="atènyer">         <i>atè</i><par n="empè/nyer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="empènyer">        <i>empè</i><par n="empè/nyer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="empènyer">        <p><l>empé</l>      <r>empè</r></p><par n="empé/nyer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="plànyer">         <i>plà</i><par n="empè/nyer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="restrènyer">      <i>restrè</i><par n="empè/nyer__vblex"/></e>
